Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 1 Uniform Unclaimed Property Act
66-29-156. Verified report of property.

If a person does not file a report required by §66-29-123, or the treasurer believes that a person may have filed an inaccurate, incomplete, or false report, the treasurer may require the person to file a verified report on a form prescribed by the treasurer. The report must:

State whether the person is holding property reportable under this part;

Describe property not previously reported or about which the treasurer has enquired; and

Specifically identify property described under subdivision (2) for which there is a dispute as to whether it is reportable under this part and state the amount or value of the property.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-157. Examination of records to determine compliance — Administrative subpoena.

The treasurer, at reasonable times and upon providing reasonable notice, may:

Examine the records of a person to determine whether the person has complied with this part, including appropriate records in the possession of an agent of the person under examination, if such records are reasonably necessary to determine whether the person under examination has complied with this part;

Issue an administrative subpoena requiring a person or an agent of the person to make records available for examination; and

Bring an action seeking judicial enforcement of the subpoena.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-158. Rules for conducting examination.

The treasurer shall prescribe by rule procedures and standards for an examination under § 66-29-157, including procedures and standards for the use of an estimation, extrapolation, and statistical sampling during an examination.

An examination under § 66-29-157 must be performed in accordance with procedures and standards adopted by rule under subsection (a) and with generally accepted examination procedures and standards applicable to unclaimed property examinations.

If a person subject to examination under § 66-29-157 has filed all reports required by § 66-29-123 and has retained the records required by § 66-29-126, the following provisions apply:

The examination must include a review of the person's records;

The examination must not be based on an estimate unless the person expressly consents in a record to the use of an estimate; and

The person conducting the examination shall consider all evidence presented by the person in good faith in preparing a report of the examination under § 66-29-162.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-159. Confidentiality of records obtained during examination.

Records obtained in the course of conducting an examination under § 66-29-157, including work papers compiled by the treasurer or the treasurer's agents, employees, or designated representatives, and any information that identifies the fact that a particular person, institution, business, or entity was or is the subject of an examination under § 66-29-157, are confidential and are not public records; provided, that the records and information are not confidential:

To the extent that the person, institution, business, or entity that was or is the subject of the examination consents to disclosure;

To the extent that the treasurer, or the treasurer's employees, agents, or representatives use the records for the purpose of administering this part;

If used for the purposes of complying with a subpoena or a court order;

In joint unclaimed property examinations or audits conducted by the treasurer with, or pursuant to, an agreement with another state, federal agency, or any other governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality;

To the extent that the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designees use the records for the purpose of an audit; or

In the course of any action or proceeding by the treasurer or the treasurer's employees, agents, or representatives to collect unclaimed property, to collect any unpaid interest due on unclaimed property, or to otherwise enforce this part.

As used in this section, “work papers” means those records created to serve as an input for final reporting documents.

All final reports submitted to the treasurer pursuant to § 66-29-123 are records open to the public, including the identity of any holder that submits a report; provided, that any information included in a final report that identifies the fact that a holder was the subject of an audit conducted under this part must be redacted prior to disclosure unless the disclosure falls within one (1) of the exceptions under subsection (a).

The treasurer has the sole discretion to implement disciplinary actions against any employee, agent, or representative of the treasurer who intentionally discloses records that are deemed confidential under this section, including, but not limited to, terminating a contract with any vendor that violates this section.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-160. Evidence of unpaid debt or undischarged obligation.

A record of a putative holder showing an unpaid debt or undischarged obligation is prima facie evidence of the debt or obligation.

A putative holder may establish by a preponderance of the evidence that there is no unpaid debt or undischarged obligation with respect to such debt or obligation or that the debt or obligation was not, or no longer is, a fixed and certain obligation of the putative holder.

A putative holder may overcome prima facie evidence under subsection (a) by establishing by a preponderance of the evidence that a check, draft, or similar instrument was:

Issued as an unaccepted offer in settlement of an unliquidated amount;

Issued but later replaced with another instrument because the earlier instrument was lost or contained errors that were corrected;

Issued to a party affiliated with the issuer;

Paid, satisfied, or discharged;

Issued in error;

Issued without consideration;

Voided within a reasonable time after issuance for a valid business reason set forth in a contemporaneous record; or

Issued but not delivered to the third-party payee for a sufficient reason recorded within a reasonable time after issuance.

In asserting a defense under this section, a putative holder may present evidence of a course of dealing or custom and practice between the putative holder and the apparent owner.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-161. Failure of person examined to retain records.

If a person subject to examination under §66-29-157 does not retain the records required by §66-29-126, the treasurer may determine the amount of property due using a reasonable method of estimation based on all information available to the treasurer, including extrapolation and the use of statistical sampling when appropriate and necessary, consistent with examination procedures and standards adopted under §66-29-158.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-162. Report to person whose records were examined.

At the conclusion of an examination under §66-29-157, unless waived in writing by the person being examined, the treasurer shall provide to the person whose records were examined a complete and unredacted examination report, which must identify in detail:

The work performed;

The property types reviewed;

The methodology of any estimation technique, extrapolation, or statistical sampling used in conducting the examination;

Each calculation showing the value of property determined to be due; and

The findings of the person conducting the examination.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-163. Request for intervention — Conference.

If a person subject to examination under § 66-29-157 believes the person conducting the examination has made an unreasonable or unauthorized request or is not proceeding expeditiously to complete the examination, the person in a record may ask the treasurer to intervene and take remedial action as the circumstances may require, including countermanding the request of the person conducting the examination, imposing a time limit for completion of the examination, or reassigning the examination to another person.

If a person in a record requests a conference with the treasurer to present matters that are the basis of a request for intervention under subsection (a), the treasurer shall hold the conference not later than thirty (30) days after receiving the request. The treasurer may hold the conference in person, by telephone, or by electronic means. The treasurer may designate an employee of the treasurer to hold the conference under this subsection (b).

If a conference is held under subsection (b), the treasurer, or the treasurer's designee, shall provide a report in a record of the conference to the person that requested the conference not later than thirty (30) days after the conference.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-164. Treasurer's contract with another to conduct examination.

The treasurer may contract with a person to conduct an examination under this part. The treasurer shall make any contract entered into under this section available for public inspection during normal business hours.

Not less than sixty (60) days before contracting with a person to conduct an examination for the treasurer under subsection (a), the treasurer shall give the person to be examined a demand in a record to submit a report and deliver property that is subject to this part.

On request by a person subject to examination by a contractor, the treasurer shall deliver to the person a complete unredacted copy of the contract between the treasurer and the contractor relating to the examination and any contract between the contractor and a person employed or engaged by the contractor to conduct the examination.

It is hereby declared unlawful for the treasurer, or an individual employed by the treasurer who participates in, recommends, or approves the award of a contract under this section, to bid on, procure, or have any interest in a contract to conduct an examination under this section during the tenure of the treasurer's or employee's office or employment, and for six (6) months thereafter.

A person violating subsection (a) is liable to the state for any and all sums paid out by the state, together with interest at the rate of eight percent (8%) per annum, growing out of any such transaction.

A violation of subdivision (d)(1) is a Class E felony.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-165. Report by treasurer.

Not later than four (4) months after the end of a fiscal year, the treasurer shall compile and submit a report to the governor, comptroller of the treasury, speaker of the senate, and speaker of the house of representatives which must contain the following information for the immediately preceding fiscal year:

The total amount and value of all property paid or delivered to the treasurer under this part, separated into:

The amount voluntarily paid or delivered; and

The amount paid or delivered as a result of an examination under § 66-29-157, which amount must be separated into the amount recovered as a result of an examination conducted by:

A state employee; and

A person under contract under § 66-29-164;

The name and amount paid to each contractor under § 66-29-164 and the percentage the total compensation paid to all contractors under § 66-29-164 bears to the total value of all property paid or delivered to the treasurer as a result of examinations;

The total amount and value of all property paid or delivered by the treasurer to persons that made claims for property held by the treasurer and the percentage the total payments made, or value of property paid or delivered, to claimants bears to the total value of property paid or delivered to the treasurer; and

The total amount of:

Claims made by persons claiming to be owners which were denied;

Claims made by persons claiming to be owners which were approved; and

Funds received and the value of property held by the treasurer subject to claims of owners.

The report submitted by the treasurer under subsection (a) is a public record subject to public disclosure without redaction under title 10, chapter 7, part 5.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-166. Determination of liability for
failure or refusal to pay or deliver property to treasurer.

If the treasurer determines from an examination conducted under §66-29-157 that a putative holder has failed or refused to pay or deliver property to the treasurer which is reportable under this part, the treasurer shall issue a determination of the putative holder's liability with respect to the payment or delivery of property, and provide to the putative holder notice in a record of the determination.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-167. Informal conference to review determination of liability.

Not later than thirty (30) days after receipt of a notice of determination of liability under § 66-29-166 a putative holder may request an informal conference with the treasurer to review the determination. The treasurer may designate an employee to act on behalf of the treasurer for all purposes of this section.

If a putative holder makes a timely request under subsection (a) for an informal conference:

The treasurer shall set a place and time for the conference not later than twenty (20) days after the date of the request, unless the putative holder and the treasurer mutually agree upon a later date;

The treasurer shall give the putative holder notice of the time and place of the conference;

The conference may be held in person, by telephone, or by electronic means, as determined by the treasurer;

The conference may be postponed, adjourned, and reconvened as the treasurer determines appropriate;

The treasurer, or the treasurer's designee with the approval of the treasurer, may modify a determination made under § 66-29-166 in part or withdraw it in its entirety; and

The treasurer shall issue a decision in a record and provide a copy of the record to the putative holder and examiner not later than twenty (20) days after the conference ends unless the putative holder and the treasurer mutually agree to continue the conference.

A conference under subsection (b) is not an administrative remedy and is not a contested case subject to title 4, chapter 5. An oath is not required and rules of evidence do not apply in the conference.

At a conference under subsection (b), the putative holder must be given an opportunity to confer informally with the treasurer and the person who examined the records of the putative holder to:

Discuss the determination made under § 66-29-166; and

Present any issue the putative holder wishes to raise concerning the validity of the determination.

If the treasurer fails to act within a period prescribed in subsection (b), the failure does not affect a right of the treasurer, except that interest does not accrue on the amount for which the holder was determined to be liable under § 66-29-166 during the period in which the treasurer failed to act until the earlier of:

The date the putative holder files an action under § 66-29-169; or

If no action is filed under § 66-29-169, the conclusion of the ninety-day period for filing an action under § 66-29-169.

The treasurer may hold an informal conference with the putative holder without a request at any time before a putative holder files suit under § 66-29-169.

Penalties under § 66-29-173 and § 66-29-174 continue to accrue for property not reported, paid, or delivered as required by this part following the initiation and during the pendency of an informal conference under this section.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-168. Judicial review of determination.

A putative holder may seek relief from a determination under §66-29-166 by seeking judicial review of the determination under §66-29-169.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-169. Action against treasurer.

Not later than ninety (90) days after receiving notice of the treasurer's determination under § 66-29-166, the putative holder may:

File an action against the treasurer in the chancery court for Davidson County challenging all or part of the treasurer's determination of liability and seeking a declaration that the determination is unenforceable, in whole or in part; or

Pay or deliver the property to the treasurer and, not later than six (6) months after payment or delivery, initiate an action against the treasurer in the chancery court for Davidson County for a refund of all or part of the amount paid or a return of all or part of the property delivered.

If a putative holder pays or delivers the property to the treasurer at any time after the putative holder files an action under subdivision (a)(1), the court must continue the action as if it had been filed originally as an action for a refund or return of property under subdivision (a)(2).

A putative holder that is the prevailing party in an action under subsection (a) for a refund of money paid to the treasurer is entitled to interest on the amount refunded, at the same rate of interest a holder is required to pay to the treasurer under § 66-29-137, from the date paid to the treasurer until the date of the refund.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-170. Action to enforce determination and secure payment or delivery.

When a determination under § 66-29-166 becomes final, and after the period for filing an action under § 66-29-169, the treasurer may commence an action in the chancery court for Davidson County or in an appropriate court of another state to enforce the determination and secure payment or delivery of past due, unpaid, or undelivered property.

In an action under subsection (a), if no court in this state has jurisdiction over the defendant, the treasurer may commence an action in a federal or state court of competent jurisdiction.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-171. Cooperation with another state or foreign country.

The treasurer may:

Securely exchange information with another state or foreign country relating to property presumed abandoned or relating to the possible existence of property presumed abandoned; and

Authorize in a record another state or foreign country, or a person acting on behalf of another state or country, to examine its records of a putative holder; provided, that the state, country, or person agrees to abide by the provisions of § 66-29-159.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-172. Action involving another state or foreign country.

The treasurer, with the approval of the attorney general and reporter, may join other states or foreign countries to examine and seek enforcement of this part against any person believed to be holding property reportable under this part.

On request of another state or foreign country, the attorney general and reporter may commence an action on behalf of such state or country to enforce, in this state, the law of such state or country against a putative holder of property presumed abandoned and subject to a claim by the other state or country; provided, that such state or country agrees to pay the costs incurred by the attorney general and reporter in the action.

The treasurer, with approval of the attorney general and reporter, may request the official authorized to enforce the unclaimed property law of another state or foreign country to commence an action to recover property in such state or country on behalf of the treasurer. This state shall pay all costs, including reasonable attorney's fees and expenses, incurred by such state or country in an action under this subsection (c).

The treasurer, with approval of the attorney general and reporter, may pursue an action on behalf of this state to recover property subject to this part that is delivered into the custody of another state if the treasurer believes the property is subject to the custody of the treasurer.

The treasurer, with approval of the attorney general and reporter, may retain a private attorney in this state or another state or foreign country to commence an action to recover property on behalf of the treasurer and may agree to pay attorney's fees based in whole or in part on a fixed fee, hourly fee, or a percentage of the amount or value of property recovered in the action.

Expenses incurred by this state in an action under this section may be paid from property received under this part or net proceeds from the property. Expenses incurred to recover property must not be deducted from the amount that is subject to a claim under this part by the owner.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-173. Civil penalty for failure to report, pay, or deliver property within prescribed time.

Except as otherwise provided in §§66-29-174 and66-29-175, the treasurer may assess against a holder who fails to report, pay, or deliver property within the time prescribed by this part a civil penalty of two hundred dollars ($200) for each day the duty is not performed, up to a cumulative maximum amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000).

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-174. Civil penalty for evasion or failure to perform duty — Civil penalty for making fraudulent report.

If a holder enters into a contract or other arrangement for the purpose of evading an obligation under this part, or otherwise willfully fails to perform a duty imposed on the holder under this part, the treasurer may assess against the holder a civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day the obligation is evaded or the duty is not performed, up to a cumulative maximum amount of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), plus an additional twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount or value of any property for which the holder had a duty or obligation to report, pay, or deliver under this part.

If a holder makes a fraudulent report under this part, the treasurer may assess against the holder a civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day from the date the fraudulent report was filed until a true and correct report is filed, up to a cumulative maximum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), plus an additional twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount or value of any property for which the holder had duty to report.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-175. Waiver of civil penalty.

The treasurer has the authority to not assess or to waive any penalty under §66-29-173 or §66-29-174.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-176. Enforceability of agreement to locate property.

An agreement with an owner whereby the owner is to pay a fee or other remuneration for locating, delivering, recovering, or assisting in the recovery of property that has not yet been reported to the treasurer under this part is enforceable only if the agreement:

Is in writing;

Clearly sets forth the nature of the property and the services to be rendered;

Is signed by the apparent owner;

States the value of the property before and after the fee; and

Contains such other information as the state treasurer may, by rule, require.

An agreement by an apparent owner and a person, the primary purpose of which is to locate, deliver, recover, or assist in the location, delivery, or recovery of property held by the treasurer, is enforceable only if the agreement:

Is in a record that clearly sets forth the nature of the property and the services to be provided;

Is signed by or on behalf of the apparent owner;

States the amount or value of the property reasonably estimated or expected to be recovered, computed both before and after a fee or other compensation to be paid to the other person has been deducted;

Does not provide for compensation of more than ten percent (10%) of the value of the recoverable property or fifty dollars ($50.00), whichever is greater; and

Contains such other information as the state treasurer may, by rule, require.

An agreement under this section is void and unenforceable if it is entered into within two (2) years from the date on which the property was paid or delivered by the holder to the treasurer.

If a provision in an agreement described in this section applies to mineral proceeds for which compensation must be paid to a person based in whole or in part on a portion of the underlying minerals or mineral proceeds not then presumed abandoned, the provision is void and unenforceable, regardless of when the agreement is executed.

This section does not apply to an apparent owner's agreement with an attorney to pursue a claim for recovery of specifically identified property held by the treasurer or to contest the treasurer's denial of a claim for recovery of the property.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-177. Apparent owner's agent.

An apparent owner that contracts with a person to locate, deliver, recover, or assist in the location, delivery, or recovery of property of the apparent owner that is held by the treasurer may appoint or designate the person as the apparent owner's agent. The appointment or designation must be in a record signed by the apparent owner and delivered to the treasurer.

An apparent owner's agent is entitled to receive from the treasurer all information concerning the property which the apparent owner would be entitled to receive, including information that would otherwise be confidential information under § 66-29-178.

If authorized by the apparent owner, the apparent owner's agent may bring an action against the treasurer on behalf of, and in the name of, the apparent owner.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-178. Disclosure and use of confidential information.

Information that is confidential under any law of this state other than this part, another state, or the United States, including personally identifying information, as that term is defined in § 10-7-504(a)(29)(C), and personal information, as that term is defined in § 47-18-2107, continues to be confidential when disclosed or delivered under this part to the treasurer or the treasurer's agent; provided, that information that would otherwise be confidential, if for good cause and reasonably necessary for the enforcement or implementation of this part, may be disclosed by the treasurer or the treasurer's agent to:

An apparent owner or the apparent owner's personal representative or attorney, next of kin, or agent designated under § 66-29-177;

A deceased apparent owner's personal representative or attorney, next of kin, agent designated under § 66-29-177, or heir;

Another department or agency of this state or the United States;

The person who administers the unclaimed property law of another state, if the state accords substantially reciprocal privileges to the treasurer and the state agrees to maintain the confidentiality and security of the information in the same manner as the treasurer; and

A person who is the subject of an examination in an administrative or judicial proceeding relating to the property.

The treasurer and the treasurer's agent shall not use confidential information provided to them or in their possession for any purpose except as expressly authorized by this part or required by any other law of this state.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (a), the treasurer shall include on a website or in a database as required by § 66-29-130(b)(4) the name of each apparent owner of property held by the treasurer. The treasurer may include on the website or in the database additional information concerning the apparent owner's property if the treasurer believes the information will assist in facilitating identification and return of the property to the owner, and the treasurer does not disclose personally identifying information other than the home or physical address of an apparent owner.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

66-29-179. Confidentiality agreement.

A person to be examined under §66-29-157 may require, as a condition of disclosing the person's records, that the treasurer or the treasurer's agent who has access to the records disclosed in the examination execute and deliver to the person to be examined a confidentiality agreement that:

Is in a form that is reasonably satisfactory to the treasurer; and

Requires the person to comply with the provisions of this part applicable to the person.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

66-29-180. Inclusion of confidential information in notice not required.

A holder is not required under this part to include confidential information in a notice the holder is required to provide to an apparent owner under this part.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-181. Maintenance of confidential information in secure manner.

If a holder is required to include confidential information in a report to the treasurer, the information must be provided in a secure manner.

If confidential information in a record is provided to and maintained by the treasurer and the treasurer's agent as required by this part, the treasurer and the treasurer's agent shall:

Implement administrative, technical, and physical safeguards designed to protect the security, confidentiality, and integrity of the information as required by state and federal law; and

Protect against reasonably anticipated threats or hazards to the security, confidentiality, or integrity of the information, and against unauthorized access to or use of the information for the purpose of preventing substantial harm or inconvenience to a holder or the holder's customers, including insureds, annuitants, policy or contract owners, and beneficiaries.

The treasurer shall:

Maintain confidential information held pursuant to this part in accordance with security and confidentiality policies prescribed by rule of the department of treasury; and

Require that the treasurer's agent maintain confidential information held pursuant to this part in a secure manner.

The treasurer or the treasurer's agent shall comply, and shall cooperate with a holder, if applicable, in complying with the requirements of § 47-18-2107 regarding the unauthorized acquisition of computerized data.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

66-29-182. Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this part, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among the states that enact it.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-183. Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, this part modifies, limits, or supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq.). This part does not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of the Act (15 U.S.C. § 7001(c)), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of the Act (15 U.S.C. § 7003(b)).

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-184. Transitional provision.

An initial report filed under this part for property that was not required to be reported before July 1, 2017, but that is required to be reported under this part after July 1, 2017, must include all items of property that would have been presumed abandoned during the ten-year period immediately preceding July 1, 2017, as if this chapter had been in effect during that period.

This part does not relieve a holder of a duty that arose before July 1, 2017, to report, pay, or deliver property under any provision of law in effect before July 1, 2017. Except as otherwise provided in § 66-29-140, a holder who did not comply with the law governing unclaimed property before July 1, 2017, is subject to applicable provisions for enforcement and penalties in effect before July 1, 2017.

Interest on interest-bearing property is not payable for any period before July 1, 2017, unless authorized by a provision of law superseded by this part.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.